Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2012.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-2003, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2003. Fees; vehicle title and registration; identification plate; definitions A. The following fees are required: 1. For each certificate of title, salvage certificate of title, restored salvage certificate of title or nonrepairable vehicle certificate of title, $4. 2. For each certificate of title for a mobile home, $7. The director shall deposit $3 of each fee imposed by this paragraph in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991. 3. Except as provided in section 28-1177, for the annual registration of: (a) A motor vehicle that is: (i) Fueled exclusively by motor vehicle fuel or use fuel, $8. , except that the fee for (ii) Fueled exclusively by an alternative fuel that is not a use fuel and that does not operate using motor vehicle fuel or use fuel, an amount equal to $85 multiplied by the ratio of the motor fuel tax imposed by section 28-5606, subsection A to $.18. (iii) Fueled by a combination of alternative fuel and motor vehicle fuel or use fuel, an amount equal to $40 multiplied by the ratio of the motor fuel tax imposed by section 28-5606 to $.18. (b) Motorcycles, is $9. 4. For a duplicate registration card or any duplicate permit, $4. 5. For each special ninety day nonresident registration issued under section 28-2154, $15. 6. For the registration of a trailer or semitrailer that is not a travel trailer, that is ten thousand pounds or less declared gross weight and that is used in the furtherance of a commercial enterprise, $8. 7. For the registration of a trailer or semitrailer that is not a travel trailer and that exceeds ten thousand pounds declared gross weight: (a) On initial registration, a onetime fee of $245. (b) On renewal of registration or if previously registered in another state, a onetime fee of: (i) If the trailer's or semitrailer's model year is less than six years old, $145. (ii) If the trailer's or semitrailer's model year is at least six years old, $95. 8. For the registration of a noncommercial trailer that is not a travel trailer and that is ten thousand pounds or less declared gross weight: (a) On initial registration, a onetime fee of $20. (b) On renewal of registration, a onetime fee of $5. 9. For a transfer of a noncommercial trailer that is not a travel trailer and that is ten thousand pounds or less declared gross weight, $12. 10. For each special ninety day resident registration issued under section 28-2154, $15. 11. For each one trip registration permit issued under section 28-2155, $1. 12. For each temporary general use registration issued under section 28-2156, $15. 13. For each identification plate bearing a serial or identification number to be affixed to any vehicle, $5. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Declared gross weight" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-5431. 2. "Travel trailer" means a trailer that is: (a) Mounted on wheels. (b) Designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use. (c) Less than eight feet in width and less than forty feet in length. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Requirements for enactment; two-thirds vote Pursuant to article IX, section 22, Constitution of Arizona, this act is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature and is effective immediately on the signature of the governor or, if the governor vetoes this act, on the subsequent affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.